Utah statutes.
77-23-104.   Written plan -- Approval of magistrate.
(1)  An administrative traffic checkpoint may be established and operated upon
written authority of a magistrate.
(2)  A magistrate may issue written authority to establish and operate an
administrative traffic checkpoint if:
(a)  a command level officer submits to the magistrate a written plan signed
by the command level officer describing:
(i)  the location of the checkpoint including geographical and topographical
information;
(ii)  the date, time, and duration of the checkpoint;
(iii)  the sequence of traffic to be stopped;
(iv)  the purpose of the checkpoint, including the inspection or inquiry to be
conducted;
(v)  the minimum number of personnel to be employed in operating the
checkpoint, including the rank of the officer or officers in charge at the
scene;
(vi)  the configuration and location of signs, barriers, and other means of
informing approaching motorists that they must stop and directing them to the
place to stop;
(vii)  any advance notice to the public at large of the establishment of the
checkpoint; and
(viii)  the instructions to be given to the enforcement officers operating the
checkpoint;
(b)  the magistrate makes an independent judicial determination that the plan
appropriately:
(i)  minimizes the length of time the motorist will be delayed;
(ii)  minimizes the intrusion of the inspection or inquiry;
(iii)  minimizes the fear and anxiety the motorist will experience;
(iv)  minimizes the degree of discretion to be exercised by the individual
enforcement officers operating the checkpoint; and
(v)  maximizes the safety of the motorist and the enforcement officers; and
(c)  the administrative traffic checkpoint has the primary purpose of
inspecting, verifying, or detecting:
(i)  drivers that may be under the influence of alcohol or drugs;
(ii)  license plates, registration certificates, insurance certificates, or
driver licenses;
(iii)  violations of Title 23, Wildlife Resources Code of Utah; or
(iv)  other circumstances that are specifically distinguishable by the
magistrate from a general interest in crime control.
(3)  Upon determination by the magistrate that the plan meets the requirements
of Subsection (2), the magistrate shall sign the authorization and issue it to
the command level officer, retaining a copy for the court's file.
(4)  A copy of the plan and signed authorization shall be issued to the
checkpoint command level officer participating in the operation of the
checkpoint.
(5)  Any enforcement officer participating in the operation of the checkpoint
shall conform his activities as nearly as practicable to the procedures
outlined in the plan.
(6)  The checkpoint command level officer shall be available to exhibit a copy
of the plan and signed authorization to any motorist who has been stopped at
the checkpoint upon request of the motorist.
